District of Columbia statutes.
6-321.02

Determination of necessity.

The Council of the District of Columbia shall, prior to transferring to the Agency right, title, and interest in and to any of the said property described in § 6-321.01, determine whether such property is necessary to the redevelopment of the southwest section of the District of Columbia in accordance with a master plan approved by it, and, if it so finds, it shall, acting on behalf of the United States, transfer and donate to the Agency all right, title, and interest of the United States in and to so much of said property as it determines is necessary to carry out such master plan.

History

Sept. 8, 1960, 74 Stat. 871, Pub. L. 86-736, § 2
July 9, 2012, 126 Stat. 990, Pub. L. 112-143, § 1(c)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 5-823.
1973 Ed., § 5-721.

Effect of Amendments

Pub. L. 122-143 substituted “a master plan” for “an urban renewal plan”; and substituted “such master plan” for “such urban renewal plan”.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 402 (128) of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to the District of Columbia Council, subject to the right of the Commissioner as provided in § 406 of the Plan. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.